dictionaries/sk/index.aff
SFX B Y 183
SFX B   0           y          [áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           a          [áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           ov         [áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           u          [áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           om         [áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           e          [áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           och        [áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           mi         [áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           y          [^áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           u          [^áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           ov         [^áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           om         [^áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           e          [^áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           och        [^áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           mi         [^áéíóúý]rod
SFX B   0           y          [^r]od
SFX B   0           u          [^r]od
SFX B   0           ov         [^r]od
SFX B   0           om         [^r]od
SFX B   0           e          [^r]od
SFX B   0           och        [^r]od
SFX B   0           mi         [^r]od
SFX B   0           y          [^o]d
SFX B   0           u          [^o]d
SFX B   0           ov         [^o]d
SFX B   0           om         [^o]d
SFX B   0           e          [^o]d
SFX B   0           och        [^o]d
SFX B   0           mi         [^o]d
SFX B   0           a          otok
SFX B   0           a          stol
SFX B   0           y          to[klnv]
SFX B   0           u          to[klnv]
SFX B   0           ov         to[klnv]
SFX B   0           om         to[klnv]
SFX B   0           och        to[klnv]
SFX B   0           om         to[klnv]
SFX B   0           mi         to[klnv]
SFX B   0           y          [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           a          [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           ov         [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           u          [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           om         [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           e          [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           och        [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           om         [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           mi         [^t]o[klnv]
SFX B   0           i          iál
SFX B   0           e          [^i]ál
SFX B   0           y          el
SFX B   0           u          el
SFX B   0           ov         el
SFX B   0           om         el
SFX B   0           i          el
SFX B   0           och        el
SFX B   0           ami        el
SFX B   ôl          oly        ôl
SFX B   ôl          ola        ôl
SFX B   ôl          olov       ôl
SFX B   ôl          olu        ôl
SFX B   ôl          olom       ôl
SFX B   ôl          ole        ôl
SFX B   ôl          oloch      ôl
SFX B   ôl          olami      ôl
SFX B   0           y          [^eoô]l
SFX B   0           u          [^eoô]l
SFX B   0           ov         [^eoô]l
SFX B   0           om         [^eoô]l
SFX B   0           e          [^áeoô]l
SFX B   0           och        [^eoô]l
SFX B   0           ami        [^eoô]l
SFX B   0           e          yv
SFX B   0           y          [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           a          [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           ov         [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           u          [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           om         [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           och        [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           om         [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           mi         [^o][knv]
SFX B   0           y          [aeíoúy]r
SFX B   0           a          [oúy]r
SFX B   0           ov         [aeíoúy]r
SFX B   0           u          [aeíoúy]r
SFX B   0           om         [aeíoúy]r
SFX B   0           e          [^n][aeíoúy]r	# L charakter
SFX B   0           a          ner		# G skenner
SFX B   0           i          ner		# L skenner
SFX B   0           och        [aeíoúy]r
SFX B   0           mi         [aeíoúy]r
SFX B   us          y          mus
SFX B   us          u          mus
SFX B   us          ov         mus
SFX B   us          om         mus
SFX B   us          e          mus
SFX B   us          och        mus
SFX B   us          ami        mus
SFX B   os          u          mos
SFX B   os          om         mos
SFX B   os          e          mos
SFX B   os          y          mos
SFX B   os          ov         mos
SFX B   os          och        mos
SFX B   os          ami        mos
SFX B   0           y          [^m]us
SFX B   0           u          [^m]us
SFX B   0           ov         [^m]us
SFX B   0           om         [^m]us
SFX B   0           e          [^m]us
SFX B   0           och        [^m]us
SFX B   0           mi         [^m]us
SFX B   0           y          [^u]s
SFX B   0           ov         [^u]s
SFX B   0           u          [^u]s
SFX B   0           om         [^u]s
SFX B   0           e          [^u]s
SFX B   0           och        [^u]s
SFX B   0           mi         [^u]s
SFX B   0           a          [^au]s
SFX B   0           a          át
SFX B   0           y          [áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           u          [áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           ov         [áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           om         [áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           e          [áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           och        [áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           mi         [áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           y          [^áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           a          [^áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           ov         [^áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           u          [^áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           om         [^áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           e          [^áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           och        [^áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           mi         [^áéíóúý]vet
SFX B   0           y          [^čv]et
SFX B   0           u          [^čv]et
SFX B   0           ov         [^čv]et
SFX B   0           om         [^čv]et
SFX B   0           e          [^čv]et
SFX B   0           och        [^čv]et
SFX B   0           mi         [^čv]et
SFX B   0           a          šit
SFX B   0           a          ust
SFX B   0           a          kút
SFX B   0           y          [^e]t
SFX B   0           u          [^e]t
SFX B   0           ov         [^e]t
SFX B   0           om         [^e]t
SFX B   0           e          [^e]t
SFX B   0           och        [^e]t
SFX B   0           ami        [^e]t
SFX B   0           a          ivot
SFX B   0           e          [aá]v
SFX B   0           y          o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           a          o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           ov         o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           u          o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           om         o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           e          o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           och        o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           mi         o[hlm]ov
SFX B   0           y          [^dgklrstv]
SFX B   0           u          [^dgklrstv]
SFX B   0           ov         [^dgklrstv]
SFX B   0           om         [^dgklrstv]
SFX B   0           e          [^dghklrstv]
SFX B   0           och        [^dgklrstv]
SFX B   0           mi         [^dgklmrstv]
SFX B   0           ami        [m]
SFX B   0           ia         ťan
SFX B   og          gov        zog
SFX B   og          gy         zog
SFX B   og          gu         zog
SFX B   og          gom        zog
SFX B   og          goch       zog
SFX B   og          gmi        zog
SFX B   0           y          [^z]og
SFX B   0           u          [^z]og
SFX B   0           ov         [^z]og
SFX B   0           om         [^z]og
SFX B   0           och        [^z]og
SFX B   0           mi         [^z]og
